Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 16 The Rhode Island Limited-Liability Company Act
7-16-66.
Annual report of domestic and foreign limited-liability companies.

Each domestic limited-liability company and each foreign limited-liability company authorized to transact business in this state, shall file, between the first day of February and the first day of May in each year following the calendar year in which its original articles of organization or application for registration were filed with the secretary of state, an annual report setting forth:

The name and address of the principal office of the limited-liability company;

The state or other jurisdiction under the laws of which it is formed;

[Deleted by P.L. 2021, ch. 137, § 3 and P.L. 2021, ch. 138, § 3.]

The current mailing address of the limited-liability company and the name or title of a person to whom communications may be directed;

A brief statement of the character of the business in which the limited-liability company is actually engaged in this state; and

Any additional information required by the secretary of state.

[Deleted by P.L. 2021, ch. 137, § 3 and P.L. 2021, ch. 138, § 3.]

The information in the annual report shall be given as of the date of the execution of the report. It shall be executed by an authorized person of the domestic limited-liability company and by a person with authority to do so under the laws of the state or other jurisdiction of organization of a foreign limited-liability company. Proof to the satisfaction of the secretary of state that prior to May 1 the report was deposited in the United States mail in a sealed envelope, properly addressed, with postage prepaid, is deemed to be timely filed.

If the secretary of state finds that the annual report conforms to the requirements of this chapter, the secretary of state shall file the report. If the secretary of state finds that it does not conform, the secretary of state shall promptly return the report to the limited-liability company for any necessary corrections, in which event the penalties subsequently prescribed for failure to file the report within the time previously provided do not apply if the report is corrected to conform to the requirements of this chapter and returned to the secretary of state within thirty (30) days from the date on which it was mailed to the limited-liability company by the secretary of state.

Each limited-liability company, domestic or foreign, that fails or refuses to file its annual report for any year within thirty (30) days after the time prescribed by this chapter is subject to a penalty of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 171, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 188, § 5; P.L. 2007, ch. 97, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 108, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 137, § 3, effective January 1, 2022; P.L. 2021, ch. 138, § 3, effective January 1, 2022.

7-16-67.
Filing of returns with the tax administrator — Annual charge.

A return, in the form and containing the information as the tax administrator may prescribe, shall be filed with the tax administrator by the limited-liability company:

In case the fiscal year of the limited-liability company is the calendar year, on or before the fifteenth day of March in the year following the close of the fiscal year; and

In case the fiscal year of the limited-liability company is not a calendar year, on or before the fifteenth day of the third month following the close of the fiscal year.

For tax years on or after January 1, 2016, a return, in the form and containing the information as the tax administrator may prescribe, shall be filed with the tax administrator by the limited-liability company and shall be filed on or before the date a federal tax return is due to be filed, without regard to extension.

An annual charge shall be due on the filing of the limited-liability company’s return filed with the tax administrator and shall be paid to the division of taxation as follows:

If the limited-liability company is treated as a corporation for purposes of federal income taxation, it shall pay the taxes as provided in chapters 11 and 12 [repealed] of title 44; or

If the limited-liability company is not treated as a corporation for purposes of federal income taxation, it shall pay a fee in an amount equal to the minimum tax imposed upon a corporation under §

44-11-2(e)

. The due date for a limited-liability company that is not treated as a corporation for purposes of federal income taxation shall be on or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month following the close of the fiscal year.

For tax years on or after January 1, 2016, a return, in the form and containing the information as the tax administrator may prescribe, shall be filed with the tax administrator by the limited-liability company and shall be filed on or before the date a federal tax return is due to be filed, without regard to extension.

The annual charge is delinquent if not paid by the due date for the filing of the return and an addition of one hundred dollars ($100) to the charge is then due.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 19, § 3; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 13, § 6.

7-16-67.1.
Revocation of articles or authority to transact business for nonpayment of fee.

The tax administrator may, after July 15 of each year, make up a list of all limited-liability companies that have failed to pay the fee defined in §

7-16-67

for one year after the fee became due and payable, and the failure is not the subject of a pending appeal. The tax administrator shall certify to the correctness of the list. Upon receipt of the certified list, the secretary of state may initiate revocation proceedings as defined in §

7-16-41

.

With respect to any information provided by the division of taxation to the secretary of state pursuant to this chapter, the secretary of state, together with the employees or agents thereof, shall be subject to all state and federal tax confidentiality laws applying to the division of taxation and the officers, agents, and employees thereof, and which restrict the acquisition, use, storage, dissemination, or publication of confidential taxpayer data.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 371, § 3; P.L. 2017, ch. 376, § 3.

7-16-68.
Limited-liability company property.

Real and personal property owned, purchased, or leased by a limited-liability company shall be held, owned, and conveyed in the limited-liability company name. Instruments and documents providing for the acquisition, mortgage or disposition of property of the limited-liability company are valid and binding on the limited-liability company if executed by one or more managers of a limited-liability company having a manager or managers or one or more members of a limited-liability company in which management has been retained in the members.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 171, § 1.

7-16-69.
Certificates and certified copies to be received in evidence.

All certificates issued by the secretary of state in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, and all copies of documents filed in the secretary of state’s office in accordance with the provisions of this chapter when certified by the secretary of state, shall be taken and received in all courts.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-70.
Parties to actions.

A member of a limited-liability company is not a proper party to proceedings by or against a limited-liability company, except for an action brought under §

7-16-56

and except where the object is to enforce a member’s right against or liability to the limited-liability company.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-71.
Unauthorized assumption of powers.

All persons who assume to act as a limited-liability company without authority to do so are jointly and severally liable for all debts and liabilities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-72.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application. To this end, the provisions of this chapter are severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-73.
Construction with other laws.

Unless the provisions of this chapter or the context indicate otherwise, each reference in the general laws to a “person” is deemed to include a limited-liability company, and each reference to a “corporation”, except for references in the Rhode Island Business and Nonprofit Corporation Acts, and except with respect to taxation, is deemed to include a limited-liability company.

As to taxation, a domestic or foreign limited-liability company shall be treated in the same manner as it is treated under federal income tax law.

If a domestic or foreign limited-liability company is treated as a partnership for purposes of federal income taxation:

Any member of the limited-liability company during any part of the limited-liability company’s taxable year shall file a Rhode Island income tax return and shall include in Rhode Island gross income that portion of the limited-liability company’s Rhode Island income allocable to the member’s interest in the limited-liability company.

Any member of the limited-liability company who is a non-resident shall execute and forward to the limited-liability company before the original due date of the Rhode Island limited-liability company return an agreement that states that the member will file a Rhode Island income tax return and pay income tax on the non-resident member’s share of the limited-liability company’s income that was derived from or attributable to sources within this state, and the agreement shall be attached to the limited-liability company’s Rhode Island return for the taxable year.

In the event that the non-resident member’s executed agreement is not attached to the Rhode Island limited-liability company return or the agreement set forth above is attached to the limited-liability company return and subsequently the non-resident member fails to file a timely income tax return, then within thirty (30) days of the date of notice by the Tax Administrator to the limited-liability company, the limited-liability company shall remit to the Tax Administrator the non-resident member’s tax on the member’s share of the limited-liability company’s income that was derived from or attributable to sources within this state, which tax shall be computed at the statutory rate applicable to corporations.

A non-resident member is required to file a Rhode Island income tax return even though the member’s only source of Rhode Island income was that member’s share of the limited-liability company’s income that was derived from or attributable to sources within this state, and the amount of remittance by the limited-liability company on behalf of the non-resident member shall be allowed as a credit against that member’s Rhode Island income tax liability.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-74.
Forms to be furnished by secretary of state.

All documents required by this chapter to be filed in the office of the secretary of state shall be made on forms that shall be prescribed by the secretary of state. Forms for all documents to be filed in the office of the secretary of state may be furnished by the secretary of state upon request, but their use, unless otherwise specifically prescribed in this chapter, is not mandatory.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-75.
Reservation of power.

The general assembly shall at all times have power to prescribe any regulations, provisions and limitations that it deems advisable, which regulations, provisions and limitations are binding on any limited-liability companies subject to the provisions of this chapter, and the general assembly has power to amend, repeal or modify this chapter at pleasure.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-76.
Low-profit limited-liability company.

A low-profit limited-liability company shall at all times significantly further the accomplishment of one or more charitable or educational purposes within the meaning of § 170(c)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 170(c)(2)(B), or its successor, and would not have been formed but for the entity’s relationship to the accomplishment of charitable or educational purposes.

A limited-liability company that intends to qualify as a low-profit limited-liability company pursuant to the provisions of this section shall so indicate in its articles of organization, shall organize under the provisions of §

7-16-6

, and shall further state that:

No significant purpose of the entity is the production of income or the appreciation of property; provided, however, that the fact that an entity produces significant income or capital appreciation shall not, in the absence of other factors, be conclusive evidence of a significant purpose involving the production of income or the appreciation of property.

No purpose of the entity is to accomplish one or more political or legislative purposes within the meaning of § 170(c)(2)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 170(c)(2)(D), or its successor.

If an entity that met the requirements of this section at its formation at any time ceases to satisfy any one of the requirements, it shall immediately cease to be a low-profit limited-liability company, but by continuing to meet all the other requirements of this chapter, will continue to exist as a limited-liability company. The name of the entity must be changed to be in conformance with §

7-16-9

.

Nothing in this section shall prevent a limited-liability company that is not organized under it from electing a charitable or educational purpose in whole or in part for doing business under this chapter.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, all provisions of the Rhode Island Limited-Liability Act, chapter 16 of this title, applicable to domestic limited-liability companies are applicable to low-profit limited-liability companies.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 67, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 79, § 2.